Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2263.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 SF 2263 (3) 91 sb/js/mb S.F. 2263 DIVISION I 1 FIREARMS, AMMUNITION, OR DANGEROUS WEAPONS ââ PUBLICLY 2 ACCESSIBLE PARKING LOTS 3 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 724.4F Dangerous weapons in 4 publicly accessible parking lots. 5 1. A person may carry, transport, or possess a dangerous 6 weapon in a privately owned motor vehicle on the real property 7 comprising a publicly accessible, nonsecure parking lot that 8 is operated by the state or a county, city, or township in the 9 state if the carrying, transportation, or possession of the 10 dangerous weapon is otherwise lawful under the laws of this 11 state and if the dangerous weapon remains out of sight and 12 inside a locked vehicle on the real property when the vehicle 13 is unoccupied. 14 2. This section does not apply to a parking lot at a 15 facility, including an armory, owned or operated by the 16 national guard. 17 3. For purposes of this section, âfacilityâ and ânational 18 guardâ mean the same as defined in section 29A.1. 19 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This division of this Act, being 20 deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. 21 DIVISION II 22 FIREARMS IN VEHICLES TRANSPORTING FOSTER CHILDREN 23 Sec. 3. Section 237.3, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 24 following new subsection: 25 NEW SUBSECTION . 14. Rules of the department shall not 26 prohibit the otherwise lawful carrying, transportation, or 27 possession of a firearm, regardless of whether the firearm is 28 loaded, in motor vehicles used to transport a child in foster 29 care. 30 DIVISION III 31 FIREARMS OR OFFENSIVE WEAPONS IN OR NEAR SCHOOLS AND PUBLIC 32 PARKS 33 Sec. 4. Section 724.4A, Code 2026, is amended to read as 34 follows: 35 -1- SF 2263 (3) 91 sb/js/mb 1/ 2 S.F. 2263 724.4A Weapons free zones Schools and public parks ââ 1 enhanced penalties. 2 1. As used in this section , âweapons free zoneâ means 3 the area in or on, or within one thousand feet of, the real 4 property comprising a public or private elementary or secondary 5 school, or in or on the real property comprising a public park. 6 A weapons free zone shall not include that portion of a public 7 park designated as a hunting area under section 461A.42 . 8 2. Notwithstanding sections 902.9 and 903.1 , a person who 9 commits a public offense involving a firearm or offensive 10 weapon, within a weapons free zone the area in or on, or within 11 one thousand feet of, the real property comprising a public or 12 private elementary or secondary school, or in or on the real 13 property comprising a public park , in violation of this or any 14 other chapter shall be subject to a fine of twice the maximum 15 amount which that may otherwise be imposed for the public 16 offense. This section shall not apply to any portion of a 17 public park designated as a hunting area under section 461A.42. 18 -2- SF 2263 (3) 91 sb/js/mb 2/ 2